New York, session 2025-2026, S6920.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The penal law is amended by adding two new sections 195.30 2 and 195.35 to read as follows: 3 § 195.30 Undisclosed self-dealing in the second degree. 4 A person is guilty of undisclosed self-dealing in the second degree 5 when, being a public servant, such person intentionally engages in 6 conduct or a course of conduct in their official capacity in connection 7 with the award of a public contract or public grant or other effort to 8 obtain or retain public business or public funds that is intended to 9 confer an undisclosed benefit on themself, a spouse, domestic partner, 10 child, parent, or sibling of the public servant, a person with whom a 11 public servant has a business or other financial relationship, or a firm 12 in which the public servant has a present or potential interest and 13 thereby obtains or attempts to obtain a benefit for themself, a spouse, 14 domestic partner, child, parent, or sibling of the public servant, a 15 person with whom a public servant has a business or other financial 16 relationship, or a firm in which the public servant has a present or 17 potential interest with a value in excess of three thousand dollars. A 18 benefit is disclosed if its existence is made known prior to the alleged 19 wrongful conduct to either (i) the relevant state or local ethics 20 commission or (ii) the official responsible for the public servant's 21 appointment to their position, provided that person is not a participant 22 in the alleged wrongful conduct. 23 Undisclosed self-dealing in the second degree is a class D felony. 24 § 195.35 Undisclosed self-dealing in the first degree. 25 A person is guilty of undisclosed self-dealing in the first degree 26 when, being a public servant, such person intentionally engages in EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05599-01-5 S. 6920 2 1 conduct or a course of conduct in their official capacity in connection 2 with the award of a public contract or public grant or other effort to 3 obtain or retain public business or public funds that is intended to 4 confer an undisclosed benefit on themself, a spouse, domestic partner, 5 child, parent, or sibling of the public servant, a person with whom a 6 public servant has a business or other financial relationship, or a firm 7 in which the public servant has a present or potential interest and 8 thereby obtains or attempts to obtain a benefit for themself, a spouse, 9 domestic partner, child, parent, or sibling of the public servant, a 10 person with whom a public servant has a business or other financial 11 relationship, or a firm in which the public servant has a present or 12 potential interest with a value in excess of ten thousand dollars. A 13 benefit is disclosed if its existence is made known prior to the alleged 14 wrongful conduct to either (i) the relevant state or local ethics 15 commission or (ii) the official responsible for the public servant's 16 appointment to their position, provided that person is not a participant 17 in the alleged wrongful conduct. 18 Undisclosed self-dealing in the first degree is a class C felony. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.